Arkansas, session 2025, HB1948.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 5-10-105(a)(1), concerning the offense of
negligent homicide as a result of operating a vehicle, an aircraft, or a
watercraft, is amended to read as follows:
(a)(1) A person commits negligent homicide if he or she negligently
causes the death of another person, not constituting murder or manslaughter,
as a result of operating a vehicle, an aircraft, or a watercraft:
(A) While intoxicated;
(B)(i) If at that time there is an alcohol concentration
of eight hundredths (0.08) or more in the person's breath or blood based upon
*TNL387*
04/01/2025 9:49:12 AM TNL387

HB1948
the definition of alcohol concentration in § 5-65-204, as determined by a
chemical test of the person's blood, urine, breath, saliva, or other bodily
substance.
(ii) The method of the chemical test of the person's
blood, urine, saliva, breath, or other bodily substance shall be made in
accordance with §§ 5-65-204 and 5-65-206;
(C) While passing a stopped school bus in violation of §
27-51-1004 if the person is operating a vehicle; or
(D) While fatigued; or
(E)(i) While there is any amount of a controlled substance
present in the person, as determined by a chemical test of the person's
blood, urine, breath, saliva, or other bodily substance and the person was
operating a vehicle.
(ii) The method of the chemical test of the person's
blood, urine, saliva, breath, or other bodily substance shall be made in
accordance with § 5-65-208.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 5-10-105(c), concerning definitions related
to the offense of negligent homicide, is amended to add an additional
subdivision to read as follows:
(3) "Controlled substance" means:
(A) Fentanyl;
(B) Methamphetamine;
(C) Heroin; or
(D) Cocaine.

SECTION 3. Arkansas Code § 5-65-206(d)(3), concerning compelling the
testimony of certain persons by subpoena, is amended to read as follows.
(3)(A) A person charged with violating § 5-65-103 has the right
to cross-examine or call as a witness:
(i)(A) The person who calibrates the instrument conducting
a chemical analysis of the person's bodily substances;
(ii)(B) The operator of the instrument conducting a
chemical analysis of the person's bodily substances; or
(iii)(C) A representative of the office.
(B)(i) The prosecuting attorney or the defendant may
04/01/2025 9:49:12 AM TNL387

HB1948
compel the testimony of a person listed in subdivision (d)(3)(A) of this
section by a subpoena issued to that person at least ten (10) days before the
date of the hearing or trial.
(ii) The person whose testimony is compelled shall
have with him or her the record or report at issue, and the record or report
is admissible at the hearing or trial.






























04/01/2025 9:49:12 AM TNL387